Florida, session 2026, SB600.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 144 145 Section 1.âSubsection (12) is added to section 648.25, 146 Florida Statutes, to read: 147 648.25âDefinitions.âAs used in this chapter, the term: 148 (12)ââVirtual officeâ means an office that does not provide 149 a continuous physical office space and provides professional 150 address and mail handling services and which may, upon request, 151 provide communications and telephone services or a dedicated 152 office space. 153 Section 2.âSubsection (1) and paragraph (a) of subsection 154 (2) of section 648.386, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 155 648.386âQualifications for prelicensing and continuing 156 education schools and instructors.â 157 (1)âDEFINITIONS DEFINITION OF âCLASSROOM INSTRUCTIONâ.âAs 158 used in this section, the term: 159 (a)ââClassroom instructionâ means a course designed to be 160 presented to a group of students by a live instructor using 161 lecture, video, webcast, or virtual or other audio-video 162 presentation. 163 (b)ââIn-person classroom instructionâ means a course 164 designed to be presented to a group of students by a live 165 instructor using lectures, with the instructor and students in 166 the same physical classroom at the same time. 167 (2)âSCHOOLS AND CURRICULUM FOR PRELICENSING SCHOOLS.âIn 168 order to be considered for approval and certification as an 169 approved limited surety agent and professional bail bond agent 170 prelicensing school, such entity must: 171 (a)1.âOffer a minimum of two 80-hour in-person 120-hour 172 classroom-instruction basic certification courses in the 173 criminal justice system per calendar year unless a reduced 174 number of course offerings per calendar year is warranted in 175 accordance with rules adopted promulgated by the department; or 176 2.âOffer a department-approved correspondence course 177 pursuant to department rules. 178 Section 3.âPresent paragraphs (d) through (p) of subsection 179 (1) of section 648.44, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as 180 paragraphs (e) through (q), respectively, a new paragraph (d) is 181 added to that subsection, and present paragraph (j) of that 182 subsection and subsections (4) and (9) of that section are 183 amended, to read 184 648.44âProhibitions; penalty.â 185 (1)âA bail bond agent or bail bond agency may not: 186 (d)âSolicit bail from a detainee, the detaineeâs attorney, 187 an adult member of the detaineeâs immediate family, or any other 188 person unless the detainee specifically authorizes such 189 solicitation in writing. The detainee must sign this designation 190 before the solicitation unless prohibited by the rules, 191 regulations, or ordinances governing the place of imprisonment. 192 If such a prohibition exists, the designation may be signed 193 after the detaineeâs release to ratify a previous oral 194 designation made by him or her. A solicitation to a detainee may 195 occur only after a legitimate request for bail services has been 196 received from the detainee or an individual specified in this 197 paragraph. The solicitation of a person specified in this 198 paragraph may only occur between 8 a.m. and 9 p.m., unless the 199 bail bond agent or bail bond agency has received direct and 200 specific written authorization from the detainee or the 201 detaineeâs attorney to solicit at another time. 202 (k)(j)âAccept anything of value from a principal for 203 providing a bail bond aside from except the premium, a credit 204 card merchant processing fee, a mobile payment services fee or 205 similar charge which must be separate from and not considered 206 premium, and a transfer fee authorized by the office, except 207 that the bail bond agent or bail bond agency may accept 208 collateral security or other indemnity from the principal or 209 another person in accordance with s. 648.442, together with 210 documentary stamp taxes, if applicable. No fees, expenses, or 211 charges of any kind shall be permitted to be deducted from the 212 collateral held or any return premium due, except as authorized 213 by this chapter or rule of the department or commission. Upon 214 written agreement with another party, a bail bond agent or bail 215 bond agency may, upon written agreement with another party, 216 receive a fee or compensation for returning to custody an 217 individual who has fled the jurisdiction of the court or caused 218 the forfeiture of a bond. 219 (4)âA place of business, including a branch office, may not 220 be established, opened, or maintained unless it is under the 221 active full-time charge of a licensed and appointed bail bond 222 agent. A virtual office is prohibited. 223 (9)(a)âA Any person who violates paragraph (1)(f), 224 paragraph (1)(g), paragraph (1)(h), paragraph (1)(k), paragraph 225 (1)(o), any provisions of paragraph (1)(e), paragraph (1)(f), 226 paragraph (1)(g), paragraph (1)(j), or paragraph (1)(n), or 227 subsection (2) commits a felony of the third degree, punishable 228 as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. 229 (b)âA Any person who violates the provisions of paragraph 230 (1)(a), paragraph (1)(b), paragraph (1)(c), paragraph (1)(i), 231 paragraph (1)(l), paragraph (1)(n), paragraph (1)(p), paragraph 232 (1)(q), paragraph (1)(h), paragraph (1)(k), paragraph (1)(m), 233 paragraph (1)(o), paragraph (1)(p), subsection (3), subsection 234 (4), or subsection (5) commits a misdemeanor of the first 235 degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083. 236 Section 4.âSubsection (2) of section 903.011, Florida 237 Statutes, is amended to read: 238 903.011âPretrial release; general terms; statewide uniform 239 bond schedule.â 240 (2)âAny monetary or cash component of any form of pretrial 241 release must may be met by a surety bond or by United States 242 currency, a United States postal money order, or a cashierâs 243 check in the amount of the bond. 244 Section 5.âParagraph (d) of subsection (2) of section 245 903.046, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 246 903.046âPurpose of and criteria for bail determination.â 247 (2)âWhen determining whether to release a defendant on bail 248 or other conditions, and what that bail or those conditions may 249 be, the court shall consider: 250 (d)âThe defendantâs past and present conduct, including any 251 record of convictions, previous flight to avoid prosecution, or 252 failure to appear at court proceedings. However, any defendant 253 who had failed to appear on the day of any required court 254 proceeding in the case at issue, but who had later voluntarily 255 appeared or surrendered, is not shall not be eligible for a 256 recognizance bond; and any defendant who failed to appear on the 257 day of any required court proceeding in the case at issue and 258 who was later arrested is not shall not be eligible for a 259 recognizance bond or for any form of bond which does not require 260 the greater of a monetary undertaking or commitment equal to or 261 greater than $2,000 or twice the value of the monetary 262 commitment or undertaking of the original bond, whichever is 263 greater. Notwithstanding anything in this section, the court has 264 discretion in determining conditions of release if the defendant 265 proves circumstances beyond his or her control for the failure 266 to appear. A surety bond that has been revoked may not be 267 reinstated without a written authorization from the bail bond 268 agent, bail bond agency, or surety. This section may not be 269 construed as imposing additional duties or obligations on a 270 governmental entity related to monetary bonds. 271 Section 6.âSection 903.0471, Florida Statutes, is amended 272 to read: 273 903.0471âViolation of condition of pretrial release. 274 Notwithstanding s. 907.041, a court may, on its own motion, 275 revoke pretrial release and order pretrial detention if the 276 court finds probable cause to believe that the defendant 277 committed a new crime while on pretrial release or violated any 278 other condition of pretrial release in a material respect. Upon 279 entry of such an order to revoke pretrial release and order 280 pretrial detention, other than for a failure to appear, the 281 clerk of the court must discharge any bond previously posted as 282 a condition of pretrial release without further order of the 283 court. 284 Section 7.âSection 903.05, Florida Statutes, is amended to 285 read: 286 903.05âQualification of sureties.âA surety for the release 287 of a person on bail, other than a company authorized by law to 288 act as a surety, shall be a resident of the state or own real 289 estate within the state. 290 Section 8.âSection 903.08, Florida Statutes, is repealed. 291 Section 9.âSubsection (1) of section 903.09, Florida 292 Statutes, is amended to read: 293 903.09âJustification of sureties.â 294 (1)âA surety, other than a bail bond agent as defined in s. 295 648.25, shall justify his or her suretyship by attaching to the 296 bond United States currency, a United States postal money order, 297 or a cashierâs check in the amount of the bond; however, the 298 United States currency, United States postal money order, or 299 cashierâs check may not be used to secure more than one bond 300 execute an affidavit stating that she or he possesses the 301 qualifications and net worth required to become a surety. The 302 affidavit shall describe the suretyâs property and any 303 encumbrances and shall state the number and amount of any bonds 304 entered into by the surety at any court that remain 305 undischarged. 306 Section 10.âSection 903.101, Florida Statutes, is amended 307 to read: 308 903.101âSureties; licensed persons; to have equal access. 309 Subject to rules adopted by the Department of Financial Services 310 and by the Financial Services Commission, every surety who meets 311 the requirements of s. 903.09 ss. 903.05, 903.06, 903.08, and 312 903.09, and every person who is currently licensed by the 313 Department of Financial Services and registered as required by 314 s. 648.42 must shall have equal access to the jails of this 315 state for the purpose of making bonds. 316 Section 11.âSection 903.16, Florida Statutes, is amended to 317 read: 318 903.16âDeposit of money or bonds as bail.â 319 (1)âA defendant who has been admitted to bail, or another 320 person in the defendantâs behalf, may deposit with the official 321 authorized to take bail money an amount equal to the bail amount 322 set in the court order. Such deposit must be receipted in the 323 name of the defendant or nonregistered bonds of the United 324 States, the state, or a city, town, or county in the state, 325 equal in market value to the amount set in the order and the 326 personal bond of the defendant and an undertaking by the 327 depositor if the money or bonds are deposited by another. The 328 sheriff or other officials shall may remit money or bonds 329 received to the clerk to be held by the clerk pending court 330 action or return to the defendant or depositor. The clerk shall 331 accept money or bonds remitted by the sheriff. 332 (2)âConsent is conclusively presumed for the clerk of the 333 circuit court to sell bonds deposited as bail after forfeiture 334 of the bond. 335 Section 12.âSection 903.17, Florida Statutes, is repealed. 336 Section 13.âSubsection (3) of section 903.21, Florida 337 Statutes, is amended to read: 338 903.21âMethod of surrender; exoneration of obligors.â 339 (3)(a)âThe surety shall be exonerated of liability on the 340 bond if it is determined before forfeiture breach of the bond 341 that the defendant is in any jail or prison and the surety 342 agrees in writing to pay the costs and expenses incurred in 343 returning the defendant to the jurisdiction of the court. A 344 surety is only responsible for the itemized costs and expenses 345 incurred for the transport of a defendant to whom he or she has 346 a fiduciary duty and is not liable for the costs and expenses 347 incurred in transporting any other defendant. 348 (b)âAs used in For purposes of this subsection, the term: 349 1.ââCosts and expensesâ means the prorated salary of any 350 law enforcement officer or employee of a contracted 351 transportation company as well as the actual expenses of 352 transporting each defendant, which may only consist of mileage, 353 vehicle expenses, meals, and, if necessary, overnight lodging 354 for any law enforcement officer or employee of a contracted 355 transportation company and the defendant. 356 2.ââJurisdictionâ means the county from which the defendant 357 was released on bail. 358 Section 14.âSection 903.26, Florida Statutes, is amended to 359 read: 360 903.26âForfeiture of the bond; when and how directed; 361 discharge; how and when made; effect of payment.â 362 (1)âA bail bond may shall not be forfeited unless: 363 (a)âThe information, indictment, or affidavit was filed 364 within 6 months after from the date of arrest, and 365 (b)âThe clerk of the court gave the surety at least 72 366 hoursâ notice, exclusive of Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays, 367 before the time of the required appearance of the defendant. 368 Notice is shall not be necessary if the time for appearance is 369 within 72 hours after from the time of arrest, or if the time is 370 stated on the bond. Such notice may be mailed or electronically 371 transmitted. A certificate signed by the clerk of the court or 372 the clerkâs designee which certifies that the notice required 373 under this paragraph was mailed or electronically transmitted on 374 a specified date and time and which is accompanied by a copy of 375 the required notice constitutes sufficient proof that such 376 mailing or electronic transmission was properly accomplished as 377 required in this paragraph. 378 (2)(a)âIf there is a failure of the defendant to appear as 379 required, the court must shall declare the bond and any bonds or 380 money deposited as bail forfeited. The clerk of the court shall 381 mail or electronically transmit a notice to the surety agent, 382 bail bond agency, and surety company within 5 days after the 383 forfeiture. A certificate signed by the clerk of the court or 384 the clerkâs designee which certifies, certifying that the notice 385 required under this section herein was mailed or electronically 386 transmitted on a specified date and which is accompanied by a 387 copy of the required notice constitutes, shall constitute 388 sufficient proof that such mailing or electronic transmission 389 was properly accomplished as required in this paragraph 390 indicated therein. If such mailing or electronic transmission 391 was properly accomplished as evidenced by such certificate, the 392 failure of the surety agent, a bail bond agency, of a company, 393 or of a defendant to receive such notice does shall not 394 constitute a defense to such forfeiture and may shall not be 395 grounds for discharge, remission, reduction, set aside, or 396 continuance of such forfeiture. The forfeiture must shall be 397 paid within 60 days after the date the notice was mailed or 398 electronically transmitted. 399 (b)âIf Failure of the defendant fails to appear at the 400 time, date, and place of required appearance, shall result in 401 forfeiture of the bond is forfeited. Such forfeiture must shall 402 be automatically entered by the clerk upon such failure to 403 appear, and the clerk shall follow the procedures in paragraph 404 (a). However, the court may determine, in its discretion and, in 405 the interest of justice, that an appearance by the defendant on 406 the same day as required day does not warrant forfeiture of the 407 bond; and the court may direct the clerk to set aside any such 408 forfeiture which may have been entered. Any appearance by the 409 defendant later than the required day constitutes forfeiture of 410 the bond, and the court may shall not preclude entry of such 411 forfeiture by the clerk. 412 (c)âIf there is a forfeiture of the bond, the clerk must 413 shall provide, upon request, a certified copy of the warrant or 414 capias to the bail bond agent or surety company. 415 (3)âSixty days after the forfeiture notice has been mailed 416 or electronically transmitted: 417 (a)âState and county officials having custody of forfeited 418 money shall deposit the money in the fine and forfeiture fund 419 established pursuant to s. 142.01. 420 (b)âMunicipal officials having custody of forfeited money 421 shall deposit the money in a designated municipal fund. 422 (c)âOfficials having custody of bonds as authorized by s. 423 903.16 shall transmit the bonds to the clerk of the circuit 424 court who shall sell them at market value and disburse the 425 proceeds as provided in paragraph (a) paragraphs (a) and (b). 426 (4)(a)âWhen a bond is forfeited, the clerk shall transmit 427 the bond and any affidavits to the clerk of the circuit court in 428 which the bond and affidavits are filed. The clerk of the 429 circuit court shall record the forfeiture in the deed or 430 official records book. If the undertakings and affidavits 431 describe real property in another county, the clerk shall 432 transmit the bond and affidavits to the clerk of the circuit 433 court of the county where the property is located who shall 434 record and return them. 435 (b)âThe bond and affidavits shall be a lien on the real 436 property they describe from the time of recording in the county 437 where the property is located for 2 years or until the final 438 determination of an action instituted thereon within a 2-year 439 period. If an action is not instituted within 2 years from the 440 date of recording, the lien shall be discharged. The lien will 441 be discharged 2 years after the recording even if an action was 442 instituted within 2 years unless a lis pendens notice is 443 recorded in the action. 444 (4)(5)âThe court shall discharge a forfeiture within 60 445 days after the forfeiture notice was mailed or electronically 446 transmitted upon any of the following: 447 (a)âA determination that, due to circumstances beyond the 448 defendantâs control, it was impossible for the defendant to 449 appear as required or within 60 days after the date of the 450 required appearance due to circumstances beyond the defendantâs 451 control. The potential adverse economic consequences of 452 appearing as required may not be considered as constituting a 453 ground for such a determination.; 454 (b)âA determination that, at the time of the required 455 appearance or within 60 days after the date of the required 456 appearance, the defendant was confined in an institution or 457 hospital; was confined in any county, state, federal, or 458 immigration detention facility; was deported; or is deceased.; 459 (c)âSurrender or arrest of the defendant at the time of the 460 required appearance or within 60 days after the date of the 461 required appearance in any county, state, or federal jail or 462 prison and upon a hold being placed to return the defendant to 463 the jurisdiction of the court. The court shall condition a 464 discharge or remission on the payment of costs and the expenses 465 as provided in s. 903.21(3), incurred by an official in 466 returning the defendant to the jurisdiction of the court.; or 467 (d)âA determination that the state is unwilling to seek 468 extradition of the fugitive defendant within 10 30 days after a 469 written request by the surety agent to do so, and contingent 470 upon the surety agentâs consent to pay all costs and the 471 expenses incurred by an official in returning the defendant to 472 the jurisdiction of the court, as provided in s. 903.21(3), up 473 to the penal amount of the bond. 474 (5)âFor each felony warrant that a court issues for a 475 failure to appear in court, the state shall enter the 476 information of the defendant in the National Crime Information 477 Center database with no restrictions until the defendant is 478 returned to the jurisdiction of the court. 479 (6)âThe discharge of a forfeiture may shall not be ordered 480 for any reason other than as specified herein. 481 (7)âThe payment by a surety of a forfeiture under this law 482 has shall have the same effect on the bond as payment of a 483 judgment. 484 (8)âIf the defendant is arrested and returned to the county 485 of jurisdiction of the court or has posted a new bond for the 486 case at issue before judgment, the clerk must, upon affirmation 487 by the sheriff or the chief correctional officer and, shall, 488 without further hearing or order of the court, discharge the 489 forfeiture of the bond. However, if the surety agent fails to 490 pay the costs and expenses incurred in returning the defendant 491 to the county of jurisdiction, the clerk may shall not discharge 492 the forfeiture of the bond. If the surety agent and the sheriff 493 fail to agree on the amount of such said costs, then the court, 494 after notice to the sheriff and the state attorney, must shall 495 determine the amount of the costs. 496 (9)âIf, after forfeiture of a bond, the criminal charges 497 for which the bond guaranteed appearance are resolved, 498 adjudicated, or otherwise disposed of by any action of the court 499 or state, the clerk must discharge the forfeiture and issue such 500 notice to the surety without further order of the court. If such 501 resolution or disposition occurs after payment of a forfeiture 502 or judgment, remission must be granted upon proper motion and as 503 specified under s. 903.28. 504 (10)âUnless the time for payment or discharge of the 505 forfeiture set forth in s. 903.27(1) has passed, or unless 506 payment of the forfeiture has already been made, the clerk does 507 not have standing to object to a motion to set aside a 508 forfeiture under paragraph (2)(b), a motion to discharge a 509 forfeiture under subsection (4), or a motion to reinstate a bond 510 under s. 903.31(2). 511 Section 15.âSection 903.27, Florida Statutes, is amended to 512 read: 513 903.27âForfeiture to judgment.â 514 (1)âIf the forfeiture is not paid or discharged by order of 515 a court of competent jurisdiction within 60 days after the 516 forfeiture notice has been mailed or electronically transmitted 517 and the bond is secured other than by money and bonds authorized 518 in s. 903.16, the clerk of the circuit court for the county 519 where the order was made must shall enter a judgment against the 520 surety for the amount of the penalty and issue execution. 521 However, in any case in which the bond forfeiture has been 522 discharged by the court of competent jurisdiction conditioned 523 upon the payment by the surety of certain costs or fees as 524 allowed by statute, the amount for which judgment may be entered 525 may not exceed the amount of the unpaid fees or costs upon which 526 the discharge had been conditioned. Judgment for the full amount 527 of the forfeiture may shall not be entered if payment of a 528 lesser amount will satisfy the conditions to discharge the 529 forfeiture. Within 5 10 days, the clerk shall furnish the 530 Department of Financial Services and the Office of Insurance 531 Regulation of the Financial Services Commission with a certified 532 copy of the judgment docket and shall furnish the surety company 533 at its home office a copy of the judgment, which shall include 534 the power of attorney number of the bond and the name of the 535 executing agent. If the judgment is not paid within 35 days, the 536 clerk must shall furnish the Department of Financial Services, 537 the Office of Insurance Regulation, and the sheriff of the 538 county in which the bond was executed, or the official 539 responsible for operation of the county jail, if that official 540 is not other than the sheriff, two copies of the judgment and a 541 certificate stating that the judgment remains unsatisfied. When 542 and if the judgment is properly paid or an order to vacate the 543 judgment has been entered by a court of competent jurisdiction, 544 the clerk shall immediately notify the sheriff, or other such 545 the official responsible for the operation of the county jail, 546 if other than the sheriff, and, if they have been previously 547 notified of nonpayment, the Department of Financial Services and 548 the Office of Insurance Regulation, if the department and office 549 had been previously notified of nonpayment, of such payment or 550 order to vacate the judgment. The clerk may furnish documents or 551 give notice as required in this subsection by mail or electronic 552 means. The clerk shall also immediately prepare and record in 553 the public records a satisfaction of the judgment or record the 554 order to vacate judgment. If the defendant is returned to the 555 county of jurisdiction of the court, whenever a motion to set 556 aside the judgment is filed, the operation of this section is 557 tolled until the court makes a disposition of the motion. 558 (2)âA certificate signed by the clerk of the court or her 559 or his designee which certifies, certifying that the notice 560 required in subsection (1) was mailed or electronically 561 delivered on a specified date, and is accompanied by a copy of 562 the required notice constitutes sufficient proof that such 563 mailing or electronic delivery was properly accomplished as 564 required in this subsection indicated therein. If such mailing 565 or electronic delivery was properly accomplished as evidenced by 566 such certificate, the failure of a company to receive a copy of 567 the judgment as prescribed in subsection (1) does not constitute 568 a defense to the forfeiture and is not a ground for the 569 discharge, remission, reduction, set aside, or continuance of 570 such forfeiture. 571 (3)âSurety bail bonds may not be executed by a bail bond 572 agent or a bail bond agency against whom a judgment has been 573 entered which has remained unpaid for 35 days and may not be 574 executed for a company against whom a judgment has been entered 575 which has remained unpaid for 50 days. A No sheriff or other 576 official who is empowered to accept or approve surety bail bonds 577 may not shall accept or approve such a bond executed by such a 578 bail bond agent or bail bond agency or executed for such a 579 company until such judgment has been paid. 580 (4)âAfter notice of judgment against the surety given by 581 the clerk of the circuit court, the surety, a bail bond agency, 582 or a bail bond agent shall, within 35 days after of the entry of 583 judgment, submit to the clerk of the circuit court an amount 584 equal to the judgment, unless the judgment has been set aside by 585 the court within 35 days after of the entry of the judgment. If 586 a motion to set aside the judgment has been filed pursuant to 587 subsection (5), the amount submitted must shall be held in 588 escrow until such time as the court has disposed of the motion. 589 The failure to comply with the provisions of this subsection 590 constitutes a failure to pay the judgment. 591 (5)âAfter notice of judgment against the surety given by 592 the clerk of the circuit court, the surety, bail bond agency, or 593 bail bond agent may within 35 days file a motion to set aside 594 the judgment or to stay the judgment. It shall be a condition of 595 Any such motion or and of any order to stay the judgment must be 596 conditioned on payment by that the surety of pay the amount of 597 the judgment to the clerk, which amount must shall be held in 598 escrow until such time as the court has disposed of the motion 599 to set aside the judgment. The filing of such a motion, when 600 accompanied by the required escrow deposit, acts shall act as an 601 automatic stay of further proceedings, including execution, 602 until the motion has been heard and a decision rendered by the 603 court. 604 (6)âThe failure of a state attorney to file, or of the 605 clerk of the circuit court to make, a certified copy of the 606 order of forfeiture as required by law applicable before prior 607 to July 1, 1982, does shall not invalidate any judgment entered 608 by the clerk before prior to June 12, 1981. 609 Section 16.âSection 903.28, Florida Statutes, is amended to 610 read: 611 903.28âRemission of forfeiture; conditions.â 612 (1)âOn application within 36 months after 2 years from 613 forfeiture, the court must shall order remission of the 614 forfeiture in accordance with subsection (2) if it determines 615 that there was no breach of the bond. 616 (2)âIf the defendant surrenders or is apprehended and the 617 surety has paid all costs of returning the defendant to the 618 jurisdiction of the court, if the defendant is deceased, or if 619 the state attorney is unwilling to seek extradition of the 620 defendant from any jail or prison after a request by the surety 621 agent, bail bond agency, or surety company consenting to pay all 622 costs incurred by an official in returning the defendant to the 623 jurisdiction of the court, as provided in s. 903.21(3)(a), up to 624 the penal amount of the bond, within 36 months 90 days after 625 forfeiture, the court, on motion at a hearing upon notice having 626 been given to the clerk of the circuit court and the state 627 attorney as required in subsection (4), must subsection (8), 628 shall direct remission in accordance with the following: 629 (a)âOne hundred percent of the forfeiture if the defendant 630 surrenders or is apprehended within 90 days after forfeiture and 631 the delay has not thwarted proper prosecution of the defendant 632 or if the defendant is deceased or the state is unwilling to 633 seek extradition of the defendant within 90 days after 634 forfeiture. 635 (b)âNinety-five percent of the forfeiture if the defendant 636 surrenders or is apprehended within 180 days after forfeiture 637 and the delay has not thwarted proper prosecution of the 638 defendant or if the defendant is deceased or the state is 639 unwilling to seek extradition of the defendant within 180 days 640 after forfeiture. 641 (c)âNinety percent of the forfeiture if the defendant 642 surrenders or is apprehended within 270 days after forfeiture 643 and the delay has not thwarted proper prosecution of the 644 defendant or if the defendant is deceased or the state is 645 unwilling to seek extradition of the defendant within 270 days 646 after forfeiture. 647 (d)âEighty-five percent of the forfeiture if the defendant 648 surrenders or is apprehended within 360 days after forfeiture 649 and the delay has not thwarted proper prosecution of the 650 defendant or if the defendant is deceased or the state is 651 unwilling to seek extradition of the defendant within 360 days 652 after forfeiture. 653 (e)âEighty percent of the forfeiture if the defendant 654 surrenders or is apprehended within 450 days after forfeiture 655 and the delay has not thwarted proper prosecution of the 656 defendant or if the defendant is deceased or the state is 657 unwilling to seek extradition of the defendant within 450 days 658 after forfeiture. 659 (f)âSeventy-five percent of the forfeiture if the defendant 660 surrenders or is apprehended within 540 days after forfeiture 661 and the delay has not thwarted proper prosecution of the 662 defendant or if the defendant is deceased or the state is 663 unwilling to seek extradition of the defendant within 540 days 664 after forfeiture. 665 (g)âSeventy percent of the forfeiture if the defendant 666 surrenders or is apprehended within 630 days after forfeiture 667 and the delay has not thwarted proper prosecution of the 668 defendant or if the defendant is deceased or the state is 669 unwilling to seek extradition of the defendant within 630 days 670 after forfeiture. 671 (h)âSixty-five percent of the forfeiture if the defendant 672 surrenders or is apprehended within 720 days after forfeiture 673 and the delay has not thwarted proper prosecution of the 674 defendant or if the defendant is deceased or the state is 675 unwilling to seek extradition of the defendant within 720 days 676 after forfeiture. 677 (i)âSixty percent of the forfeiture if the defendant 678 surrenders or is apprehended within 810 days after forfeiture 679 and the delay has not thwarted proper prosecution of the 680 defendant or if the defendant is deceased or the state is 681 unwilling to seek extradition of the defendant within 810 days 682 after forfeiture. 683 (j)âFifty-five percent of the forfeiture if the defendant 684 surrenders or is apprehended within 900 days after forfeiture 685 and the delay has not thwarted proper prosecution of the 686 defendant or if the defendant is deceased or the state is 687 unwilling to seek extradition of the defendant within 900 days 688 after forfeiture. 689 (k)âFifty percent of the forfeiture if the defendant 690 surrenders or is apprehended within 990 days after forfeiture 691 and the delay has not thwarted proper prosecution of the 692 defendant or if the defendant is deceased or the state is 693 unwilling to seek extradition of the defendant within 990 days 694 after forfeiture. 695 (l)âForty-five percent of the forfeiture if the defendant 696 surrenders or is apprehended within 36 months after forfeiture 697 and the delay has not thwarted proper prosecution of the 698 defendant or if the defendant is deceased or the state is 699 unwilling to seek extradition of the defendant within 36 months 700 after forfeiture of up to, but not more than, 100 percent of a 701 forfeiture if the surety apprehended and surrendered the 702 defendant or if the apprehension or surrender of the defendant 703 was substantially procured or caused by the surety, or the 704 surety has substantially attempted to procure or cause the 705 apprehension or surrender of the defendant, and the delay has 706 not thwarted the proper prosecution of the defendant. In 707 addition, remission shall be granted when the surety did not 708 substantially participate or attempt to participate in the 709 apprehension or surrender of the defendant when the costs of 710 returning the defendant to the jurisdiction of the court have 711 been deducted from the remission and when the delay has not 712 thwarted the proper prosecution of the defendant. 713 (3)âIf the defendant surrenders or is apprehended within 714 180 days after forfeiture, the court, on motion at a hearing 715 upon notice having been given to the clerk of the circuit court 716 and the state attorney as required in subsection (8), shall 717 direct remission of up to, but not more than, 95 percent of a 718 forfeiture if the surety apprehended and surrendered the 719 defendant or if the apprehension or surrender of the defendant 720 was substantially procured or caused by the surety, or the 721 surety has substantially attempted to procure or cause the 722 apprehension or surrender of the defendant, and the delay has 723 not thwarted the proper prosecution of the defendant. In 724 addition, remission shall be granted when the surety did not 725 substantially participate or attempt to participate in the 726 apprehension or surrender of the defendant when the costs of 727 returning the defendant to the jurisdiction of the court have 728 been deducted from the remission and when the delay has not 729 thwarted the proper prosecution of the defendant. 730 (4)âIf the defendant surrenders or is apprehended within 731 270 days after forfeiture, the court, on motion at a hearing 732 upon notice having been given to the clerk of the circuit court 733 and the state attorney as required in subsection (8), shall 734 direct remission of up to, but not more than, 90 percent of a 735 forfeiture if the surety apprehended and surrendered the 736 defendant or if the apprehension or surrender of the defendant 737 was substantially procured or caused by the surety, or the 738 surety has substantially attempted to procure or cause the 739 apprehension or surrender of the defendant, and the delay has 740 not thwarted the proper prosecution of the defendant. In 741 addition, remission shall be granted when the surety did not 742 substantially participate or attempt to participate in the 743 apprehension or surrender of the defendant when the costs of 744 returning the defendant to the jurisdiction of the court have 745 been deducted from the remission and when the delay has not 746 thwarted the proper prosecution of the defendant. 747 (5)âIf the defendant surrenders or is apprehended within 1 748 year after forfeiture, the court, on motion at a hearing upon 749 notice having been given to the clerk of the circuit court and 750 the state attorney as required in subsection (8), shall direct 751 remission of up to, but not more than, 85 percent of a 752 forfeiture if the surety apprehended and surrendered the 753 defendant or if the apprehension or surrender of the defendant 754 was substantially procured or caused by the surety, or the 755 surety has substantially attempted to procure or cause the 756 apprehension or surrender of the defendant, and the delay has 757 not thwarted the proper prosecution of the defendant. In 758 addition, remission shall be granted when the surety did not 759 substantially participate or attempt to participate in the 760 apprehension or surrender of the defendant when the costs of 761 returning the defendant to the jurisdiction of the court have 762 been deducted from the remission and when the delay has not 763 thwarted the proper prosecution of the defendant. 764 (6)âIf the defendant surrenders or is apprehended within 2 765 years after forfeiture, the court, on motion at a hearing upon 766 notice having been given to the clerk of the circuit court and 767 the state attorney as required in subsection (8), shall direct 768 remission of up to, but not more than, 50 percent of a 769 forfeiture if the surety apprehended and surrendered the 770 defendant or if the apprehension or surrender of the defendant 771 was substantially procured or caused by the surety, or the 772 surety has substantially attempted to procure or cause the 773 apprehension or surrender of the defendant, and the delay has 774 not thwarted the proper prosecution of the defendant. In 775 addition, remission shall be granted when the surety did not 776 substantially participate or attempt to participate in the 777 apprehension or surrender of the defendant when the costs of 778 returning the defendant to the jurisdiction of the court have 779 been deducted from the remission and when the delay has not 780 thwarted the proper prosecution of the defendant. 781 (3)(7)âThe remission of a forfeiture may not be ordered for 782 any reason other than as specified in this section herein. 783 (4)(8)âAn application for remission must be accompanied by 784 affidavits setting forth the facts on which it is founded; 785 however, the surety must establish by further documentation or 786 other evidence any claimed attempt at procuring or causing the 787 apprehension or surrender of the defendant before the court may 788 order remission based upon an attempt to procure or cause such 789 apprehension or surrender. The clerk of the circuit court and 790 the state attorney must be given 10 20 daysâ notice before a 791 hearing on an application and be furnished copies of all papers, 792 applications, and affidavits. Remission must shall be granted on 793 the condition of payment of costs, as provided in s. 794 903.21(3)(a), unless the ground for remission is that there was 795 no breach of the bond. 796 (5)(9)âThe clerk of the circuit court may enter into a 797 contract with a private attorney or into an interagency 798 agreement with a governmental agency to represent the clerk of 799 the court in an action for the remission of a forfeiture under 800 this section. 801 (6)(10)âThe clerk of the circuit court is the real party in 802 interest for all appeals arising from an action for the 803 remission of a forfeiture under this section. 804 (7)âThe clerk of the circuit court shall issue a remission 805 within 10 days after entry of a court order directing remission, 806 and a remission untimely issued accrues interest at the rate of 807 1.5 percent per month. 808 (8)âIf the defendant surrenders or is apprehended and the 809 surety has not paid all costs of returning the defendant to the 810 jurisdiction of the court, the court may order remission of the 811 forfeiture in accordance with subsection (2) if the actual costs 812 of returning the defendant to the jurisdiction of the court have 813 been deducted from the remission. 814 Section 17.âSection 903.29, Florida Statutes, is amended to 815 read: 816 903.29âArrest of principal by surety after forfeiture. 817 Within 3 2 years from the date of forfeiture of a bond, the 818 surety may arrest the principal for the purpose of surrendering 819 the principal to the official in whose custody she or he was at 820 the time bail was taken or in whose custody the principal would 821 have been placed had she or he been committed. 822 Section 18.âSubsections (1) and (2) of section 903.31, 823 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 824 903.31âCanceling the bond.â 825 (1)âWithin 10 business days after the conditions of a bond 826 have been satisfied or the forfeiture discharged or remitted, 827 the court must shall order the bond canceled and, if the surety 828 has attached a certificate of cancellation to the original bond, 829 the clerk of the court must shall mail or electronically furnish 830 an executed certificate of cancellation to the surety without 831 cost. The clerk of the court shall discharge the bond upon an 832 adjudication of guilt or innocence or an acquittal, or if a 833 period of 36 months has passed since the original bond was 834 posted., or A withholding of an adjudication of guilt, a finding 835 of guilt by a jury, or a no action by the state satisfies shall 836 satisfy the conditions of the bond. If the bond has been revoked 837 by the court, other than for a failure to appear, the clerk of 838 the court must discharge or cancel the bond. The original 839 appearance bond expires shall expire 36 months after such bond 840 has been posted for the release of the defendant from custody, 841 at which time the clerk of the court must discharge the bond. 842 This subsection does not apply to cases in which a bond has been 843 declared forfeited before the 36-month expiration, unless the 844 forfeiture was set aside or discharged. As used in this 845 subsection, the term ârevokedâ means that an act, a statement, a 846 document, or a promise has been annulled or canceled. 847 (2)âThe original appearance bond does not guarantee a 848 deferred sentence; a sentencing deferral; a delayed sentencing; 849 an appearance after entering a plea agreement; an appearance 850 during or after a presentence investigation; an appearance 851 during or after appeals; conduct during or appearance after 852 admission to a pretrial intervention program; placement in a 853 court-ordered program, including a residential mental health 854 facility; payment of fines; or attendance at educational or 855 rehabilitation facilities the court otherwise provides in the 856 judgment. If the original appearance bond has been forfeited or 857 revoked, it may the bond shall not be reinstated without 858 approval from the surety on the original bond. 859 Section 19.âSection 903.36, Florida Statutes, is repealed. 860 Section 20.âParagraph (b) of subsection (3) and paragraphs 861 (a), (d), and (g) of subsection (5) of section 907.041, Florida 862 Statutes, are amended, and paragraph (c) of subsection (5) of 863 that section is reenacted, to read: 864 907.041âPretrial detention and release.â 865 (3)âRELEASE ON NONMONETARY CONDITIONS.â 866 (b)âA No person may not shall be released on nonmonetary 867 conditions under the supervision of a pretrial release service, 868 unless the service certifies in writing to the court, before the 869 defendant is released from custody, that it has investigated or 870 otherwise verified: 871 1.âThe circumstances of the accusedâs family, employment, 872 financial resources, character, mental condition, immigration 873 status, and length of residence in the community; 874 2.âThe accusedâs record of convictions, of appearances at 875 court proceedings, of flight to avoid prosecution, or of failure 876 to appear at court proceedings; and 877 3.âOther facts necessary to assist the court in its 878 determination of the indigency of the accused and whether she or 879 he should be released under the supervision of the service. 880 (5)âPRETRIAL DETENTION.â 881 (a)âAs used in this subsection, âdangerous crimeâ means any 882 of the following: 883 1.âArson.; 884 2.âAggravated assault.; 885 3.âAggravated battery.; 886 4.âIllegal use of explosives.; 887 5.âChild abuse or aggravated child abuse.; 888 6.âAbuse of an elderly person or disabled adult, or 889 aggravated abuse of an elderly person or disabled adult.; 890 7.âAircraft piracy.; 891 8.âKidnapping.; 892 9.âHomicide.; 893 10.âManslaughter, including DUI manslaughter and BUI 894 manslaughter.; 895 11.âSexual battery.; 896 12.âRobbery.; 897 13.âCarjacking.; 898 14.âLewd, lascivious, or indecent assault or act upon or in 899 presence of a child under the age of 16 years.; 900 15.âSexual activity with a child, who is 12 years of age or 901 older but less than 18 years of age, by or at solicitation of 902 person in familial or custodial authority.; 903 16.âBurglary of a dwelling.; 904 17.âStalking and aggravated stalking.; 905 18.âAct of domestic violence as defined in s. 741.28.; 906 19.âHome invasion robbery.; 907 20.âAct of terrorism as defined in s. 775.30.; 908 21.âManufacturing any substances in violation of chapter 909 893.; 910 22.âAttempting or conspiring to commit any such crime.; 911 23.âHuman trafficking.; 912 24.âTrafficking in any controlled substance described in s. 913 893.135(1)(c)4.; 914 25.âExtortion in violation of s. 836.05.; and 915 26.âWritten threats to kill in violation of s. 836.10. 916 27.âDriving under the influence in violation of s. 917 316.193(2)(b)1. or (2)(b)3. 918 28.âFelony battery. 919 29.âBattery by strangulation. 920 (c)âUpon motion by the state attorney, the court may order 921 pretrial detention if it finds a substantial probability, based 922 on a defendantâs past and present patterns of behavior, the 923 criteria in s. 903.046, and any other relevant facts, that any 924 of the following circumstances exist: 925 1.âThe defendant has previously violated conditions of 926 release and that no further conditions of release are reasonably 927 likely to assure the defendantâs appearance at subsequent 928 proceedings; 929 2.âThe defendant, with the intent to obstruct the judicial 930 process, has threatened, intimidated, or injured any victim, 931 potential witness, juror, or judicial officer, or has attempted 932 or conspired to do so, and that no condition of release will 933 reasonably prevent the obstruction of the judicial process; 934 3.âThe defendant is charged with trafficking in controlled 935 substances as defined by s. 893.135, that there is a substantial 936 probability that the defendant has committed the offense, and 937 that no conditions of release will reasonably assure the 938 defendantâs appearance at subsequent criminal proceedings; 939 4.âThe defendant is charged with DUI manslaughter, as 940 defined by s. 316.193, and that there is a substantial 941 probability that the defendant committed the crime and that the 942 defendant poses a threat of harm to the community; conditions 943 that would support a finding by the court pursuant to this 944 subparagraph that the defendant poses a threat of harm to the 945 community include, but are not limited to, any of the following: 946 a.âThe defendant has previously been convicted of any crime 947 under s. 316.193, or of any crime in any other state or 948 territory of the United States that is substantially similar to 949 any crime under s. 316.193; 950 b.âThe defendant was driving with a suspended driver 951 license when the charged crime was committed; or 952 c.âThe defendant has previously been found guilty of, or 953 has had adjudication of guilt withheld for, driving while the 954 defendantâs driver license was suspended or revoked in violation 955 of s. 322.34; 956 5.âThe defendant poses the threat of harm to the community. 957 The court may so conclude, if it finds that the defendant is 958 presently charged with a dangerous crime, that there is a 959 substantial probability that the defendant committed such crime, 960 that the factual circumstances of the crime indicate a disregard 961 for the safety of the community, and that there are no 962 conditions of release reasonably sufficient to protect the 963 community from the risk of physical harm to persons; 964 6.âThe defendant was on probation, parole, or other release 965 pending completion of sentence or on pretrial release for a 966 dangerous crime at the time the current offense was committed; 967 7.âThe defendant has violated one or more conditions of 968 pretrial release or bond for the offense currently before the 969 court and the violation, in the discretion of the court, 970 supports a finding that no conditions of release can reasonably 971 protect the community from risk of physical harm to persons or 972 assure the presence of the accused at trial; or 973 8.a.âThe defendant has ever been sentenced pursuant to s. 974 775.082(9) or s. 775.084 as a prison releasee reoffender, 975 habitual violent felony offender, three-time violent felony 976 offender, or violent career criminal, or the state attorney 977 files a notice seeking that the defendant be sentenced pursuant 978 to s. 775.082(9) or s. 775.084, as a prison releasee reoffender, 979 habitual violent felony offender, three-time violent felony 980 offender, or violent career criminal; 981 b.âThere is a substantial probability that the defendant 982 committed the offense; and 983 c.âThere are no conditions of release that can reasonably 984 protect the community from risk of physical harm or ensure the 985 presence of the accused at trial. 986 (d)âIf a defendant is arrested for a dangerous crime that 987 is a capital felony, a life felony, or a felony of the first 988 degree, and the court determines there is probable cause to 989 believe the defendant committed the offense, the state attorney, 990 or the court on its own motion, may move shall motion for 991 pretrial detention. If the court finds a substantial probability 992 that the defendant committed the offense and, based on the 993 defendantâs past and present patterns of behavior, consideration 994 of the criteria in s. 903.046, and any other relevant facts, 995 that no conditions of release or bail will reasonably protect 996 the community from risk of physical harm, ensure the presence of 997 the defendant at trial, or assure the integrity of the judicial 998 process, the court must order pretrial detention. 999 (g)1.âIf a motion for pretrial detention is granted 1000 required under paragraph (d), the pretrial detention hearing 1001 must be held within 5 days after the defendantâs first 1002 appearance hearing or, if there is no first appearance hearing, 1003 within 5 days after the defendantâs arraignment. 1004 2.âIf a state attorney files a motion for pretrial 1005 detention under paragraph (c), the pretrial detention hearing 1006 must be held within 5 days after the filing of such motion. 1007 3.âThe defendant may request a continuance of a pretrial 1008 detention hearing. No continuance shall be for longer than 5 1009 days unless there are extenuating circumstances. The state 1010 attorney shall be entitled to one continuance for good cause. 1011 4.âThe defendant may be detained pending the completion of 1012 the pretrial detention hearing. If a defendant is released on 1013 bail pending a pretrial detention hearing under paragraph (d), 1014 the court must inform the defendant that if he or she uses a 1015 surety bond to meet the monetary component of pretrial release 1016 and the motion for pretrial detention is subsequently granted, 1017 the defendant will not be entitled to the return of the premium 1018 on such surety bond. 1019 Section 21.âSubsection (4) of section 648.45, Florida 1020 Statutes, is amended to read: 1021 648.45âActions against a licensee; suspension or revocation 1022 of eligibility to hold a license.â 1023 (4)âA Any licensee found to have violated s. 648.44(1)(b), 1024 (e), or (j) s. 648.44(1)(b), (d), or (i) shall, at a minimum, be 1025 suspended for a period of 3 months. A greater penalty, including 1026 revocation, must shall be imposed if there is a willful or 1027 repeated violation of s. 648.44(1)(b), (e), or (j) s. 1028 648.44(1)(b), (d), or (i), or the licensee has committed other 1029 violations of this chapter. 1030 Section 22.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 1031 made by this act to section 648.386, Florida Statutes, in 1032 references thereto, subsections (2) and (3) of section 626.2816, 1033 Florida Statutes, are reenacted to read: 1034 626.2816âRegulation of continuing education for licensees, 1035 course providers, instructors, school officials, and monitor 1036 groups.â 1037 (2)âThe department shall adopt rules establishing standards 1038 for the approval, regulation, and operation of the continuing 1039 education programs and for the discipline of licensees, course 1040 providers, instructors, school officials, and monitor groups. 1041 The standards must be designed to ensure that such course 1042 providers, instructors, school officials, and monitor groups 1043 have the knowledge, competence, and integrity to fulfill the 1044 educational objectives of ss. 626.2815, 626.869, 648.385, and 1045 648.386. 1046 (3)âThe department shall adopt rules establishing a process 1047 by which compliance with the continuing education requirements 1048 of ss. 626.2815, 626.869, 648.385, and 648.386 can be 1049 determined, the establishment of a continuing education 1050 compliance period for licensees, and forms necessary to 1051 implement such a process. 1052 Section 23.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 1053 made by this act to section 903.046, Florida Statutes, in a 1054 reference thereto, paragraph (c) of subsection (1) of section 1055 903.047, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 1056 903.047âConditions of pretrial release.â 1057 (1)âAs a condition of pretrial release, whether such 1058 release is by surety bail bond or recognizance bond or in some 1059 other form, the defendant must: 1060 (c)âComply with all conditions of pretrial release imposed 1061 by the court. A court must consider s. 903.046(2) when 1062 determining whether to impose nonmonetary conditions in addition 1063 to or in lieu of monetary bond. Such nonmonetary conditions may 1064 include, but are not limited to, requiring a defendant to: 1065 1.âMaintain employment, or, if unemployed, actively seek 1066 employment. 1067 2.âMaintain or commence an educational program. 1068 3.âAbide by specified restrictions on personal 1069 associations, place of residence, or travel. 1070 4.âReport on a regular basis to a designated law 1071 enforcement agency, pretrial services agency, or other agency. 1072 5.âComply with a specified curfew. 1073 6.âRefrain from possessing a firearm, destructive device, 1074 or other dangerous weapon. 1075 7.âRefrain from excessive use of alcohol, or any use of a 1076 narcotic drug or other controlled substance without a 1077 prescription from a licensed medical practitioner. 1078 8.âUndergo available medical, psychological, psychiatric, 1079 mental health, or substance abuse evaluation and follow all 1080 recommendations, including treatment for drug or alcohol 1081 dependency, and remain in a specified institution, if required 1082 for that purpose. 1083 9.âReturn to custody for specified hours following release 1084 for employment, school, or other limited purposes. 1085 10.âAny other condition that is reasonably necessary to 1086 assure the appearance of the defendant at subsequent proceedings 1087 and to protect the community against unreasonable danger of 1088 harm. 1089 Section 24.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 1090 made by this act to section 903.09, Florida Statutes, in a 1091 reference thereto, subsection (2) of section 903.286, Florida 1092 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 1093 903.286âReturn of cash bond; requirement to withhold unpaid 1094 fines, fees, court costs; cash bond forms.â 1095 (2)âAll cash bond forms used in conjunction with the 1096 requirements of s. 903.09 must prominently display a notice 1097 explaining that all funds are subject to forfeiture and 1098 withholding by the clerk of the court for the payment of costs 1099 of prosecution, costs of representation as provided by ss. 27.52 1100 and 938.29, court fees, court costs, and criminal penalties on 1101 behalf of the criminal defendant regardless of who posted the 1102 funds. 1103 Section 25.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.